Tennessee statutes. Title 59 Mines And Mining
Part 3

Mine Foremen

59-4-301. Qualifications and duties of mine foreman — Penalty for failure to comply with laws.

In order to protect the health and safety of persons employed in or around mines and the mine property, the operator or superintendent shall employ a competent and practical overseer of each and every mine whose title shall be “mine foreman.”

The foreman shall be certified as hereinbefore required in this chapter, and shall see that the applicable federal and state safety and health standards, regulations, and laws are complied with. Where it is necessary that the mine foreman be temporarily absent from the mine, the foreman shall place the mine in charge of a qualified assistant during such absence.

As used in this section:

“Mining site” means all mines and the surrounding property used in mining operations; and

“Qualified assistant” means a person who is designated by the owner or operator to ensure that all legal, safety, and compliance standards are enforced.

A qualified assistant shall have the ability, training, knowledge, and experience to ensure compliance with all legally imposed safety standards.

A qualified assistant must be able to effectively communicate legally imposed safety standards to all persons present at the mining site.

A qualified assistant shall have the same authority as the foreman when the foreman is not present at the mining site.

A qualified assistant shall not be considered an agent or representative of the owner or operator for the purposes of § 59-4-302.

More than one (1) person may be designated as a qualified assistant, if circumstances or logistics related to the mining site so require.

The designation by the owner or operator of a qualified assistant shall be in writing and specify the beginning and end dates of the designation.

The written designation required under subdivision (c)(7)(A) shall be prominently displayed at the office of the foreman on site, or displayed in such a manner that persons present at the mining site have actual notice of the designation.

Failure of the mine foreman to comply with the duties set forth herein is a Class B misdemeanor.

Acts 1915, ch. 169, § 19; Shan., §§ 3079a111, 3079a118; Code 1932, §§ 5594, 5601; Acts 1949, ch. 190, § 6; C. Supp. 1950, § 5594; Acts 1951, ch. 245, § 13 (Williams, § 5552); Acts 1953, ch. 86, § 15 (Williams, § 5638.15); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 58-412; Acts 1985, ch. 288, §§ 31, 32; 1989, ch. 591, § 112; 2017, ch. 356, § 2.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class B misdemeanor, §40-35-111.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 18 Tenn. Juris., Mines and Minerals, § 5.

59-4-302. Mine foreman is agent or representative of operator or owner.

The mine foreman is expressly declared to be the agent or representative of the operator or owner of the mine in the discharge of the duties required of such foreman by this title.

Acts 1915, ch. 169, § 19; Shan., § 3079a117; Code 1932, § 5600; Acts 1953, ch. 86, § 32 (Williams, §§ 5600, 5638.32); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 58-413.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 18 Tenn. Juris., Mines and Minerals, § 5.

59-4-303. Foreman to give notice of accidental death — Inquest — Notice of fire or explosion.

Whenever loss of life occurs by accident or explosion, the superintendent or foreman in charge shall give immediate notice to the department of labor and workforce development and to the coroner of the county in which the mine is situated. The coroner shall hold an inquest upon the body of the person whose death has been caused, and inquire carefully into the cause thereof, and shall return the findings and all testimony to the department. The company shall immediately notify the department upon the discovery of fire or explosion in any mine.

Acts 1915, ch. 169, § 24; Shan., § 3079a139; Acts 1917, ch. 111; Code 1932, § 5622; Acts 1943, ch. 143, § 1; C. Supp. 1950, § 5622; Acts 1953, ch. 86, § 18 (Williams, §§ 5622, 5638.18); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 58-414; Acts 1985, ch. 288, §§ 33-35; 2016, ch. 599, § 7.

Compiler’s Notes. Acts 2016, ch. 599, § 7, provided that references from the elevator division, division of mines, labor standards division, and division of boiler and elevator inspection, are to be changed to the department of labor and workforce development as sections are amended and volumes are replaced.